North Dakota statutes. TITLE 9 Contracts And Obligations
CHAPTER 9-06 Formation of Contract

9-06-01.
Express and implied contracts defined.

A contract is either express or implied. An express contract is one the terms of which are stated in words. An implied contract is one the existence and terms of which are manifested by conduct.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, §§ 915 to 917; R.C. 1895, §§ 3882 to 3884; R.C. 1899, §§ 3882 to 3884; R.C. 1905, §§ 5327 to 5329; C.L. 1913, §§ 5883 to 5885; R.C. 1943, § 9-0601.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 1619 to 1621.

Cross-References.

Contracts made in airplane, jurisdiction, see § 2-03-09.

9-06-02.
What contracts may be oral.

All contracts may be oral except such as are specially required by statute to be in writing.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 918; R.C. 1895, § 3885; R.C. 1899, § 3885; R.C. 1905, § 5330; C.L. 1913, § 5886; R.C. 1943, § 9-0602.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 1622.

9-06-03.
Written contract prevented by fraud — Oral contract enforceable.

When a contract which is required by law to be in writing is prevented from being put into writing by the fraud of a party thereto, any other party who by such fraud is led to believe that it is in writing and acts upon such belief to that party’s prejudice may enforce it against the fraudulent party.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 919; R.C. 1895, § 3886; R.C. 1899, § 3886; R.C. 1905, § 5331; C.L. 1913, § 5887; R.C. 1943, § 9-0603.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 1623.

9-06-04.
Contracts invalid unless in writing — Statute of frauds.

The following contracts are invalid, unless the same or some note or memorandum thereof is in writing and subscribed by the party to be charged, or by the party’s agent:

An agreement that by its terms is not to be performed within a year from the making thereof.

A special promise to answer for the debt, default, or miscarriage of another, except in the cases provided for in section 22-01-05.

An agreement for the leasing for a longer period than one year, or for the sale, of real property, or of an interest therein. Such agreement, if made by an agent of the party sought to be charged, is invalid unless the authority of the agent is in writing subscribed by the party sought to be charged.

An agreement or promise for the lending of money or the extension of credit in an aggregate amount of twenty-five thousand dollars or greater.

An agreement or promise to alter the terms of repayment or forgiveness of a debt that is in an aggregate amount of twenty-five thousand dollars or greater.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 920; R.C. 1895, § 3887; R.C. 1899, § 3887; R.C. 1905, § 5332; C.L. 1913, § 5888; R.C. 1943, § 9-0604; S.L. 1985, ch. 139, § 1; 1985, ch. 190, § 10; 1991, ch. 94, § 1.

Cross-References.

Agreements for sale of realty, see §§ 3-02-06, 47-10-01, 47-10-02.

Authorization of agent must be in writing, see § 3-02-06.

Guaranty to be in writing, see § 22-01-04.

Lease of real property, see § 47-16-01.

Seed sales agreements to be in writing, see ch. 4-25.

Partial Performance.

Alleged agreement relating to a corporation fell under the scope of N.D.C.C. § 9-06-04(1) because it could not have been performed within one year, and partial performance did not save the agreement; there was no conduct or action of the parties prior to the corporation’s dissolution that was inconsistent with closely held corporations and passive shareholders. The acceptance of a share of the profits of a corporation, although providing no work, was entirely consistent with the benefits routinely afforded to a passive shareholder.

Rickert v. Dakota Sanitation Plus, Inc., 2012 ND 37, 812 N.W.2d 413, 2012 N.D. LEXIS 24 (N.D. 2012).

District court did not clearly err by finding the parties entered into an oral agreement granting an easement to plaintiffs or in finding that the parties’

agreement was taken out of the statute of frauds by partial performance.

Niles v. Eldridge, 2013 ND 52, 828 N.W.2d 521, 2013 N.D. LEXIS 44 (N.D. 2013).

In a quiet title action, an oral agreement relating to the purchase of property did not comply with the statute of frauds, and an argument that partial performance of the alleged oral contract precluded the application of the statute of frauds was not considered because it was raised for the first time on appeal. Klein v. Sletto, 2017 ND 26, 889 N.W.2d 918, 2017 N.D. LEXIS 14 (N.D. 2017).

Partly Oral.

Contracts can be partly oral and partly written. Fronteer Directory Co. v. Maley, 1997 ND 162, 567 N.W.2d 826, 1997 N.D. LEXIS 181 (N.D. 1997).

In a beneficiary’s action against his brother and the borther’s wife, the district court did not err in admitting testimony relating to the oral agreements for the purchase of the property the beneficiary thought was his, as it was not used to add to or vary the contract for deed’s terms but to explain the circumstances surrounding the contract and the reasons for executing the contract. Heartland Trust Co. v. Finstrom (In re Estate of Finstrom), 2020 ND 227, 950 N.W.2d 401, 2020 N.D. LEXIS 228 (N.D. 2020).

Partnership Dissolution.

In a partnership dispute, a trial court did not err by finding that a written and unsigned dissolution agreement was not a valid written contract; moreover, testimony of partial performance to take the writing outside of the statute of frauds was not credible.

Knudson v. Kyllo, 2012 ND 155, 819 N.W.2d 511, 2012 N.D. LEXIS 155 (N.D. 2012).

Party to Be Charged.

There is no conflict between subdivision 4 of this section and N.D.C.C. § 47-10-01. Under the former, the “party to be charged” may be either the vendor or the vendee or their agents, while the latter requires a transfer by the vendor to be in writing. Petroleum Exch. v. Poynter, 64 N.W.2d 718, 1954 N.D. LEXIS 78 (N.D. 1954).

The term “party to be charged” as used in subdivision 4 of this section clearly includes both vendor and vendee. Petroleum Exch. v. Poynter, 64 N.W.2d 718, 1954 N.D. LEXIS 78 (N.D. 1954).

The absence of an employer’s signature on a wage summary sheet as “the party to be charged” under this section does not preclude the document’s contents from becoming terms of the overall employment agreement. Fronteer Directory Co. v. Maley, 1997 ND 162, 567 N.W.2d 826, 1997 N.D. LEXIS 181 (N.D. 1997).

9-06-05.
Contracts unenforceable unless in writing — Statute of frauds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1965, ch. 296, § 32.

Note.

For present provisions, see §§ 41-02-08, 41-02-16.

Collateral References.

Sufficiency of description of terms and conditions of lease, or lease provision, so as to comply with statute of frauds,
12 A.L.R.6th 123.

9-06-06.
Auction sale — Auctioneer memorandum sufficient.

When a sale of any goods or choses in action is made by auction, an entry by the auctioneer in the auctioneer’s salebook at the time of the sale of the kind of property sold, the terms of sale, the price, and names of the purchaser and person on whose account the sale is made is a sufficient memorandum.

Source:

R.C. 1943, § 9-0606.

Cross-References.

Authority of auctioneer to bind both parties, see § 3-05-02.

9-06-07.
Written contract supersedes oral negotiations.

The execution of a contract in writing, whether the law requires it to be written or not, supersedes all the oral negotiations or stipulations concerning its matter which preceded or accompanied the execution of the instrument.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 921; R.C. 1895, § 3888; R.C. 1899, § 3888; R.C. 1905, § 5333; C.L. 1913, § 5889; R.C. 1943, § 9-0607.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 1625.

Partnership Agreement.

Demand notes and partnership agreement were so clear and unambiguous on the subjects of capital and debt that they precluded evidence about related oral negotiations inconsistent with the written documents. Pear v. Grand Forks Motel Assocs., 553 N.W.2d 774, 1996 N.D. LEXIS 222 (N.D. 1996).

9-06-08.
Written contract takes effect on delivery.

A contract in writing takes effect upon its delivery to the party in whose favor it is made or to that party’s agent.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 922; R.C. 1895, § 3889; R.C. 1899, § 3889; R.C. 1905, § 5335; C.L. 1913, § 5891; R.C. 1943, § 9-0608.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 1626.

9-06-09.
Law of transfers of property applies.

The provisions of the laws of this state concerning the delivery of grants, absolute and conditional, apply to all written contracts.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 923; R.C. 1895, § 3890; R.C. 1899, § 3890; R.C. 1905, § 5336; C.L. 1913, § 5892; R.C. 1943, § 9-0609.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 1627.

9-06-10.
How seal affixed. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1973, ch. 80, § 21.

9-06-11.
Seals abolished.

All distinctions between sealed and unsealed instruments are abolished.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 925; R.C. 1895, § 3892; R.C. 1899, § 3892; R.C. 1905, § 5338; C.L. 1913, § 5894; R.C. 1943, § 9-0611.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 1629.